Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 18. Virginia Outdoors Foundation.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16- 576. Deed of Gift of Conservation Easement; No. 16-579. Deeds of Easement to Local Government for Natural Open Space, Conservation or Rural Preservation; No. 16-580. Deed of Conservation Easement for Forest Lands.

§ 10.1-1800.
Establishment and administration of Foundation; appointment, terms, chairman, quorum, etc., of board of trustees.

The Virginia Outdoors Foundation is established to promote the preservation of open-space lands and to encourage private gifts of money, securities, land or other property to preserve the natural, scenic, historic, scientific, open-space and recreational areas of the Commonwealth. The Virginia Outdoors Foundation is a body politic and shall be governed and administered by a board of trustees composed of seven trustees from the Commonwealth at large to be appointed by the Governor for four-year terms. Appointments shall be made to achieve a broad geographical representation of members. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. No trustee-at-large shall be eligible to serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. All trustees-at-large shall post bond in the penalty of $5,000 with the State Comptroller prior to entering upon the functions of office.

The Governor shall appoint a chairman of the board from among the seven trustees-at-large to a two-year term. No member shall be eligible to serve more than two consecutive terms as chairman. A majority of the members of the board serving at any one time shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History.

1966, c. 525, §§ 10-159 to 10-162; 1970, c. 757; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 190; 2000, cc. 21, 294; 2003, cc. 78, 90; 2011, cc. 691, 714.

Cross references.

As to review of proposed acquisitions of real property by Department of General Services, see § 2.2-1149. As to fee for open-space preservation, see §

58.1-817

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 21 and 294 are identical, and in the second sentence of the first paragraph, deleted “the State Treasurer, or his designee and” following “board of trustees composed of,” and substituted “seven” for “six.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 78 and 90 are identical, and inserted the third sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and in the second paragraph, added “to a two-year term” to the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

§ 10.1-1801.
Powers of Foundation.

The Virginia Outdoors Foundation shall have the following general powers:

To have succession until dissolved by the General Assembly, in which event title to the properties of the Foundation, both real and personal, shall, insofar as consistent with existing contractual obligations and subject to all other legally enforceable claims or demands by or against the Foundation, pass to and become vested in the Commonwealth;

To sue and be sued in contractual matters in its own name;

To promulgate regulations as it deems necessary for the administration of its functions in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.);

To accept, hold, and administer gifts and bequests of money, securities, or other property, absolutely or in trust, for the purposes for which the Foundation is created. Unless otherwise restricted by the terms of the gift or bequest, the Foundation is authorized to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of and to invest or reinvest in such investments as it may determine the moneys, securities, or other property given or bequeathed to it. The principal of such funds, together with the income therefrom and all other revenues, shall be placed in such depositories as the Foundation shall determine and shall constitute a special fund and be subject to expenditure by the Foundation without further appropriation. The Foundation shall not engage in any business except in the furtherance of its objectives;

To acquire by gift, devise, purchase, or otherwise, absolutely or in trust, and to hold and, unless otherwise restricted by the terms of the gift or devise, to encumber, convey, or otherwise dispose of, any real property, or any estate or interest therein, as may be necessary and proper in carrying into effect the purposes of the Foundation;

To enter into contracts generally and to execute all instruments necessary or appropriate to carry out its purposes;

To appoint and prescribe the duties of such officers, agents, and employees as may be necessary to carry out its functions, and to fix and pay such compensation to them for their services as the Foundation may determine; and

To perform any lawful acts necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the Foundation.

History.

1966, c. 525, § 10-163; 1988, c. 891.

Cross references.

As to fee for open-space preservation, see §

58.1-817

.

§ 10.1-1801.1.
Open-Space Lands Preservation Trust Fund.

The Foundation shall establish, administer, manage, including the creation of reserves, and make expenditures and allocations from a special nonreverting fund in the state treasury to be known as the Open-Space Lands Preservation Trust Fund, hereinafter referred to as the Fund. The Foundation shall establish and administer the Fund solely for the purpose of providing grants in accordance with this section to localities acquiring fee simple title or other rights, interests, or privileges in property or persons conveying to the Foundation fee simple title or other rights, interests, or privileges in property on agricultural, forestal, or other open-space land pursuant to the Open-Space Land Act (§

10.1-1700

et seq.) and, if applicable, the Virginia Conservation Easement Act (§

10.1-1009

et seq.).

The Fund shall consist of general fund moneys, gifts, endowments or grants from the United States government, its agencies and instrumentalities, and funds from any other available sources, public or private.

Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of a biennium shall remain in the Fund, and shall not revert to the general fund. Interest earned on moneys received by the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it.

The purpose of grants made from the Fund shall be to aid localities acquiring fee simple title or other rights, interests, or privileges in property or persons conveying to the Foundation fee simple title or other rights, interests, or privileges in property with the costs associated with the conveyance of the property interest, which may include legal costs, appraisal costs, or all or part of the value of the property interest. In cases where a grant is used to purchase all or part of the value of a property interest, moneys from the Fund may also be used by the Foundation to pay for an appraisal, provided that the appraisal is the only appraisal paid for by the Foundation in the acquisition of a particular property interest. To be eligible for a grant award, the property interest shall be compliant with the Open-Space Land Act (§

10.1-1700

et seq.).

The Foundation shall establish guidelines for submittal and evaluation of grant applications. In evaluating grant applications, the Foundation may give priority to applications that:

Request a grant to pay only legal and appraisal fees for a property interest that is being donated by the landowner;

Request a grant to pay costs associated with conveying a property interest on a family-owned or family-operated farm; or

Demonstrate the applicant’s financial need for a grant.

No open-space land for which a grant has been awarded under this section shall be converted or diverted from open-space land use unless:

Such conversion or diversion is in compliance with subsection A of §

10.1-1704

; and

Any open-space easement on the land substituted for land subject to an easement with respect to which a grant has been made under this section meets the eligibility requirements of this section.

Up to $100,000 per year of any interest generated by the Fund may be used for the Foundation’s administrative expenses.

History.

1997, c. 338; 1999, c. 927; 2000, c. 181; 2003, cc. 78, 90; 2009, c. 599; 2020, c. 567.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 599, cl. 2 provides: “That, after the effective date of this act [July 1, 2009], any local coholder may convey the entirety of its interest to the Virginia Outdoors Foundation notwithstanding any requirements in effect prior to the date of this act.”

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection D, added the second sentence in the first paragraph, and added the last sentence in the last paragraph, and added the second sentence in subsection E.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 181, in the second sentence of subsection A, substituted “localities acquiring open-space easements or persons conveying conservation or open-space easements or” for “persons conveying conservation easements, as defined by §

10.1-1009

”; in the first sentence of subsection D, inserted “localities acquiring open-space easements or,” inserted “or open-space” preceding “easements with the costs,” and substituted “the conveyance of the easements” for “such a conveyance”; in the last sentence of subsection D and in subdivisions (E)(1) and (E)(2), inserted “or open-space” preceding “easement”; and added subsection G.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 78 and 90 are identical, and deleted the former first two sentences of subsection E, which read: “In awarding grants from the Fund, the Foundation shall consider the recommendations of the regional advisory boards established pursuant to §

10.1-1801.2

. In the event that the regional advisory board fails to make a recommendation within a reasonable amount of time, as determined by the Foundation, after receiving written notice of a planned meeting, the Foundation may act on a grant application.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 599 inserted “or, if the Foundation consents, the Foundation and” in subdivision D 2; deleted former subdivision D 3, which read: “If the local coholder ceases to exist, the easement shall vest solely in the Foundation. If a local coholder of an easement for which a grant has been awarded under this section ceases to exist, the Foundation shall within two years convey the interest in the easement that was held by the local coholder to another qualified local coholder. If no qualified local coholder is willing to accept the easement, the Foundation shall diligently continue to seek a qualified local coholder”; and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 567 rewrote the section.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Costs associated with conveyance. —

The cost of a baseline documentation report should be considered a “cost associated with the conveyance of an easement” and therefore eligible for funding through grants made from the Open-Space Lands Preservation Trust Fund.
See opinion of Attorney General to Ms. Brett C. Glymph, Executive Director, Virginia Outdoors Foundation, 15-058, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (2/19/16).

The cost of obtaining a land survey, when necessary or prudent to do so, qualifies as a “cost associated with the conveyance of an easement” that is eligible for funding through grants made from the Open-Space Lands Preservation Trust Fund. See opinion of Attorney General to Ms. Brett C. Glymph, Executive Director, Virginia Outdoors Foundation, 15-058, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (2/19/16).

§ 10.1-1801.2.
Repealed by Acts 2003, cc. 78 and 90, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-1801.2

, pertaining to regional open-space preservation advisory boards, was derived from Acts 1997, c. 338.

§ 10.1-1802.
Annual report.

The Foundation shall submit an annual report to the Governor and General Assembly on or before November 1 of each year. The report shall contain, at a minimum, the annual financial statements of the Foundation for the year ending the preceding June 30.

History.

1966, c. 525, § 10-164; 1984, c. 734; 1985, c. 146; 1988, c. 891; 2004, c. 650.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 650 deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The annual report shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of § 2.2-1127.”

§ 10.1-1803.
Gifts, devises and bequests.

Gifts, devises or bequests, whether personal or real property, and the income therefrom, accepted by the Foundation, shall be deemed to be gifts to the Commonwealth, which shall be exempt from all state and local taxes, and shall be regarded as the property of the Commonwealth for the purposes of all tax laws.

History.

1966, c. 525, § 10-165; 1988, c. 891.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-576. Deed of Gift of Conservation Easement; No. 16-1105. Statement as to Exemption from Recording Tax.

§ 10.1-1804.
Cooperation of state agencies, etc.

All state officers, agencies, commissions, departments, and institutions are directed to cooperate with and assist the Virginia Outdoors Foundation in carrying out its purpose, and to that end may accept any gift or conveyance of land or other property in the name of the Commonwealth from the Foundation. Such property shall be held in possession or used as provided in the terms of the trust, contract, or instrument by which it is conveyed.

History.

1966, c. 525, § 10-166; 1988, c. 891.